Hawaii, session 2025, SB1381.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that section 121-12(a), Hawaii Revised Statutes, currently mandates that the Hawaii army national guard and air national guard each be headed by an assistant adjutant general, with the rank capped at brigadier general.  While most states' national guard components are federally authorized to be headed by officers with a maximum rank of brigadier general, the Department of the Air Force has authorized the Hawaii air national guard to be led by an officer with the rank of major general, reflecting the organization's size and complexity.  Additionally, the chief of staff position for the Hawaii air national guard is federally authorized at the grade of major general. Accordingly, the purposes of this Act are to: (1)  Allow the head of the Hawaii air national guard to hold the rank authorized by the Department of the Air Force, which is currently major general; (2)  Provide the adjutant general with the flexibility to assign either the chief of staff or the assistant adjutant general to lead the Hawaii air national guard; and (3)  Authorize the pay and allowances for the chief of staff of the Hawaii air national guard to be determined according to the pay tables of the regular air force of the United States. SECTION 2. Section 121-12, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a) The headquarters staff of the national guard shall be composed of the army national guard component, which shall include a selective service section, and the air national guard component.  The headquarters shall be staffed by [such] the officers, warrant officers, and enlisted personnel, in the grades and branches of service as may be authorized by the secretaries of the army and the air force.  The army division [and the air division] shall [each] be headed by an assistant adjutant general[, who shall, while holding the office, have a grade no higher than brigadier general].  The air division shall be headed by a chief of staff or an assistant adjutant general, as determined by the adjutant general.  The assistant adjutants general[,] or chief of staff, when in the full-time employment of the department of defense, may receive the pay and allowance of their grade as fixed by the tables of the regular army or air force of the United States." SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act, upon its approval, shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ BY REQUEST